Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 10 Public Building Authorities Act of 1971
12-10-116. Municipal leases, loan agreements, sales contracts or operating contracts authorized — Agreements relating to interest rates.

Any municipal corporation is authorized to enter into such leases, loan agreements, sales contracts or operating contracts by resolution of its governing body or, in the case of such agreements or contracts for the financing of a project or projects eligible to be financed pursuant to title 7, chapter 34, with a term of not more than five (5) years, by resolution of the governing body or the board or commission having jurisdiction, control and management of the utility system of the municipal corporation being financed, with an authority or other contracting party with respect to projects or parts thereof, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by such governing body, board or commission, as appropriate, notwithstanding and without regard to the restrictions, prohibitions or requirements of any other law, whether public or private.

Any lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract described in this chapter may be entered into for the purpose of refunding any bonds of a municipal corporation which can be refunded under title 9, chapter 21, parts 9 and 10. Prior to the adoption of the resolution authorizing such an agreement or contract, a plan of refunding shall be submitted for review to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee who shall proceed in the same manner as provided in § 9-21-903, in the case of an agreement or contract described in § 12-10-115(a), or § 9-21-1003, in the case of an agreement or contract described in § 12-10-115(b). If the report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee states that the plan of refunding does not substantially comply with the guidelines, if any, described in § 9-21-903, in the case of an agreement or contract described in § 12-10-115(a), or § 9-21-1003, in the case of an agreement or contract described in § 12-10-115(b), a notice in substantially the form set forth in § 9-21-903(c) and § 9-21-1003(c), as applicable, shall be published prior to the execution of the agreement or contract in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government. Any lease, loan agreement, sales contract or operating contract described in this chapter may be entered into for the purpose of converting capital outlay notes to a loan as provided in § 9-21-606(b) and § 9-21-610; provided, that no capital outlay notes shall be converted to a loan agreement later than two (2) years following the date of original issuance of such notes without the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

With respect to all or any portion of any lease, loan agreement, sales contract and operating contract described in this chapter, entered into or anticipated to be entered into, at any time during the term of the lease, loan agreement or operating contract, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this subsection (c) are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in § 12-10-111(l ), a municipal corporation, by resolution, may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the municipal corporation may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the municipal corporation to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such lease, loan agreement or operating contract.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 16; T.C.A., § 12-916; Acts 1982, ch. 902, § 14; 1984, ch. 823, § 8; 1987, ch. 191, § 1; 1997, ch. 405, § 5; 1999, ch. 426, § 2; 2001, ch. 253, § 15; 2010, ch. 868, § 77.

Attorney General Opinions. County school board's authority to contract with public building authority, OAG 99-094, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (4/21/99).

12-10-117. Execution of leases, contracts and deeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all leases, contracts, deeds of conveyance, or instruments in writing executed by the authority shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chair and secretary of the authority, or by such other officers as the board of directors, by resolution, may direct, and the seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 17; T.C.A., § 12-917.

12-10-118. Status as nonprofit corporation — Disposition of earnings.

The authority shall be a public nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds and other obligations of the authority, including reserves therefor, then any net earnings of the authority thereafter accruing may be used to provide a reserve for depreciation of any project or projects undertaken by such authority in an amount determined by the board to be necessary and reasonable, and net earnings available thereafter shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized; provided, that nothing herein contained shall prevent the board from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease entered into by the authority.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 18; T.C.A., § 12-918.

12-10-119. Dissolution of authority.

Whenever the board of directors of an authority shall by resolution determine that there has been substantial compliance with the purposes for which the authority was formed and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid, the members of the board shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Such certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the seal of the authority. Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the authority shall stand dissolved, the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to such municipality.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 19; T.C.A., § 12-919.

12-10-120. Joint operation of authorities.

The powers herein conferred upon authorities created under this chapter may be exercised by two (2) or more such authorities acting jointly. Two (2) or more municipalities may by acting jointly incorporate a public building authority to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. When two (2) or more municipalities incorporate such an authority, each and every requisite pertaining to the application for incorporation, qualification of applicants, certificate of incorporation and amendment of certificate shall, as nearly as may be practicable, be incumbent in like manner upon each municipality joining in the creation of such public building authority.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 20; T.C.A., § 12-920.

12-10-121. Project sites — State may transfer property to and contract with authorities.

Any municipal corporation may acquire a project site by gift, purchase or lease, or exercise of the power of eminent domain, and may transfer any project site to an authority by sale, lease or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the municipal corporation without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law. Such project site may be within or without the municipal corporation, or partially within and partially without the municipal corporation.

The state of Tennessee may make such contribution, grant, loan, gift, transfer, sale or lease of money or property, both real and personal, to an authority, and may enter into such contracts and agreements with respect thereto, as may from time to time be deemed necessary and desirable by the state, and subject to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 21; T.C.A., § 12-921; Acts 1980, ch. 653, § 9.

12-10-122. Application of other laws to authority — Compliance with contract requirements — Agreements concerning interest rates.

Neither this chapter nor anything herein contained shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which an authority, as a public corporation, might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the organization of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security therefor, except as herein provided, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power thereover of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law. Projects may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like project, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in § 12-10-111(j) and (k) and § 12-10-116(c), a municipal corporation or authority may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized in this chapter or in any other law notwithstanding § 12-10-111(j) and (k) and § 12-10-116(c). Nothing in § 12-10-111(j) and (k) and § 12-10-116(c) is intended to alter any existing authority in this chapter or in any other law otherwise providing authority for a municipal corporation or authority to enter into the contracts or agreements described in § 12-10-111(j) and (k) and § 12-10-116(c), previously entered into or entered into prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of guidelines, rules or regulations.

Acts 1971, ch. 126, § 22; T.C.A., § 12-922; Acts 1999, ch. 426, § 3; 2000, ch. 811, § 1.

12-10-123. [Reserved.]

An authority which operates or maintains more than one (1) project may maintain a common account or accounts and buy supplies and services in common; provided, that expenditures periodically shall be allocated to each project on an appropriate basis.

An authority in the operation, maintenance, and routine repairs of a project may purchase goods, supplies and services which are generally sold to the public by advertised price without the necessity of competitive bidding; provided, that no purchase shall exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or any larger limit as shall be allowed for such purchases under the regulations of a municipal corporation with which the authority has contracted.

No authority shall contract for the construction of buildings or improvements, the expenditure for which is estimated, projected or budgeted to be in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) except when such contract is made through a public advertisement and competitive bid process. Public advertisement shall be given at least ten (10) days in advance of accepting bids for such construction, and the authority shall award the contract to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation to bid.

No authority shall contract for the construction of buildings or improvements, the expenditure for which is estimated, projected or budgeted to be one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more except when such contract is made either:

Through a public advertisement and competitive bid process;

Through a request for proposals process which includes minimum required qualifications; or

Through a request for qualifications process which includes minimum required qualifications and a selection process pursuant to which multiple proposers are selected and prequalified to submit competitive bids.

Public advertisement shall be given at least ten (10) days in advance of accepting bids or proposals for such construction. If the authority uses the competitive bid process, the authority shall award the contract to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation to bid. If the authority uses the request for proposals process, the authority shall award the contract to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder who meets the minimum required qualifications. If the authority uses the request for qualifications process, the authority shall award the contract to the lowest pre-qualified bidder.

The authority may reject any bid or proposal from a contractor who:

At the time of the advertisement for bids or proposals, is a party to litigation or a contractual dispute with the authority or the municipality for which the authority is building or managing the project; or

Has defaulted on a contract with the authority or the municipality for which the authority is building or managing the project within the five-year period preceding the time of the advertisement for bids or proposals.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection (c), contractual arrangements for construction delivery methods other than the competitive bid method, such as, but not limited to, the construction manager method, the construction manager at risk method, and the design-build method, or for remodeling and maintenance, may be awarded by a request for proposals process as provided in subsection (d).

The authority shall contract for all services, including construction management services and design-build services, through the process provided in subsection (c) or by a request-for-proposals process; provided, however, that no such process shall be required if the authority contracts with a provider of any such service for a project who has been selected by a municipal corporation who is a contracting party or lessee with respect to such project through one (1) of the processes described in subsection (c) or this subsection (d); and provided, further, that this subsection (d) shall not apply to the provision of services for which a letter of engagement or other arrangement has been entered into prior to June 19, 2001. The request for proposals process will invite prospective proposers and will indicate the service requirements and the categories to be considered in the evaluation of the proposals, together with the relative weight of each category. The categories shall include such factors as qualifications, experience, staff availability, technical approach, minority participation and cost, as deemed appropriate by the authority. Proposers shall be given at least ten (10) days from public advertisement of the request for proposals to consider the evaluation factors set forth in the solicitation documents before submitting proposals. The contract shall be awarded to the best proposer, using the evaluation criteria set forth above, who meets the minimum required qualifications. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, contracts for professional services are not required to be awarded through a competitive bid process or a request for proposals process.

No authority shall enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement for land, buildings or leased premises which requires total lease payments or lease-purchase payments by the authority of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or greater, unless such agreement is made after competitive bids upon public advertisement or by a request for proposals process. A competitive bid process or request for proposals process is not required for an authority to enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement with a municipal corporation, the state of Tennessee, the United States, or any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality thereof.

Nothing contained herein shall require the authority to accept any bid or proposal, and the authority may choose to reject all bids or proposals.

An authority contracting with the state of Tennessee shall be subject to the same procurement procedures as though the project were being undertaken by the state of Tennessee unless the state building commission determines that a particular project should not be subject to the procurement procedures and includes a statement to that effect in the contract with the authority.

Acts 1995, ch. 74, § 5; 2001, ch. 407, § 1.

12-10-124. Common accounts — Certain purchases for which competitive bidding not required — Contracting by public invitation for proposals.